Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-982
Employees retirement system; board of trustees; meetings; duties; transition; termination.

(1) Until July 1, 2021, the board of trustees shall (a) hold regular meetings annually and such special meetings at such times as may be deemed necessary, which meetings shall be open to the public, (b) keep a record of all the proceedings of such meetings, (c) prior to January 1, 2017, and subject to the approval of the board of education, invest all cash income not required for current payments in securities of the type provided in section 79-9,107 and so reinvest the proceeds from the sale or redemption of investments, and (d) supervise the affairs of the retirement system related to the administration of benefits and approve any changes in the administration of the retirement system essential to the actuarial requirements of the retirement system.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2021, until September 1, 2024, the board of trustees, as directed by the board of education shall (a) hold regular meetings annually and such special meetings at such times as may be deemed necessary, which meetings shall be open to the public, (b) keep a record of all the proceedings of such meetings, (c) supervise the affairs of the retirement system related to the administration of benefits and recommend to the board of education any changes in the administration of the retirement system essential to the actuarial requirements of the retirement system, and (d) facilitate the transition and transfer of management and general administration of the retirement system to the retirement board effective September 1, 2024.

(3) Effective September 1, 2024, the board of trustees shall not have any duty or responsibility for the general administration of the retirement system, and the board of trustees and the terms of the members shall terminate.

Laws 1951, c. 274, § 5, p. 914;

Laws 1955, c. 321, § 1, p. 992;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 242;

Laws 1993, LB 107, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1036;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 617;

Laws 2001, LB 711, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 19;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 12.